Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-12,104
Annual report.

The department shall submit an annual report to the Governor and the Legislature on or before January 1 of each year which shall include, but not be limited to, a description of the demand for the program from microenterprises and grant recipients in Nebraska, a listing of the recipients and amounts of grants made pursuant to the Microenterprise Development Act in the previous fiscal year, the impact of the grants, a description of the partnerships between commercial lending institutions and microloan delivery organizations that have resulted from grants made by the program, and an evaluation of the program's performance based on the documented goals of the recipients. The department may require program recipients to provide periodic performance reports to enable the department to fulfill the requirements of this section.

Laws 1997, LB 327, § 10.